Washington statutes.
RCW 36.17.050

Salary withheld, when authorized.

If the superior court issues a declaratory judgment under RCW 36.16.125 finding that a county officer has abandoned his or her duties, the county officer may not be paid a salary.

[ 2009 c 337 s 2; 1999 c 71 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.17.050. Prior: 1890 p 314 s 38; RRS s 4221.]